Hawaii, session 2026, GM1102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that conditional gifts
made for purposes to support private educational efforts,
including both schooling and scholarships, promotes learning,
access, and academic advancement, and are not intended to create
contractual obligations. Treating these awards as contractual
obligations may undermine donor intent, discourage charitable
giving, and create uncertainty and inconsistent legal treatment
of these awards.
The legislature further finds that these gifts customarily
include specified eligibility criteria, including academic
performance minimums, standards of conduct, and enrollment
status, and require compliance with the donor's stated
requirements for the continuation of the award.
The legislature further finds that recognizing and
providing guidance about the nature and benefits of these
conditional educational gifts is a public purpose, and will
preserve and promote donors' intentions, will encourage
2026-1082 SB3123 SDl SMA.docx
IlillMIHIMNHIHH

Page 2 S.B. NO. 3123
S.D. 1
flexibility, innovation, and additional philanthropic
educational support across the State for students, and will
promote uniform statewide treatment.
The legislature finds that private pre-schools and private
K-12 schools in the State have long played an important role in
the community and that confirming that treating free education
and scholarships as gifts will encourage private support for
education.
The legislature further finds that establishing statewide
uniformity in the treatment of private conditional gifts will be
beneficial and avoid potentially conflicting treatment for
private sponsors of educational programs.
The legislature also finds that through this approach,
students in private pre-K and K-12 education institutions and
students receiving scholarships for this schooling will enjoy
stronger support and be able to benefit from these educational
resources, opportunities, and activities without the fear of
legal penalties for any perceived contractual obligations to the
student or the institution.
The purpose of the Act is to:
2026-1082 SB3123 SDl SMA.docx

Page 3 S.B. NO. 3123
S.D. 1
(1) Clarify and establish uniformity regarding the
relationship between private schools where no tuition
is required, students, and donors concerning
educational awards conditioned on donor-specified
requirements; and
(2) To provide that the schooling and awards are
considered conditional gifts rather than contractual
obligations unless the parties agree otherwise in
writing.
SECTION 2. The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by
adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read
as follows;
"CHAPTER
EDUCATIONAL GIFTS
§ -1 Conditional gift. (a) Unless the parties agree
otherwise in writing, any donor-conditioned educational award
for attendance at a private pre-school, elementary, middle, or
high school or any school-conditioned enrollment at any private
school where no tuition or other monetary consideration is
required or paid by the recipient shall be considered to be a
conditional gift and not a contract, notwithstanding that the
2026-1082 SB3123 SDl SMA.docx
MiUBWIimiHHIBiNII

Page 4 3123
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
donor or school operator may require the student or the
student's parents or guardians to:
(1) Pay for any optional extracurricular benefits, goods,
or services;
(2) Allow the use of the student's name, image, likeness,
or work product for non-commercial purposes; or
(3) Sign waivers, consents, or similar agreements as a
condition of participation in any school-related
activity.
(b) A conditional gift under this section may be subject
to reasonable conditions, including eligibility criteria,
academic performance minimums, standards of conduct, enrollment
status, or other donor-imposed or educational institution
requirements, and the continuation of the award shall be
contingent upon the satisfaction of those conditions.
(c) The modification or termination of any
donor-conditioned educational award or any school-conditioned
enrollment for failure to satisfy the applicable conditions
shall not give rise to a contractual claim; provided that the
conditions are applied in a manner consistent with the terms of
the award and applicable law.
2026-1082 SB3123 SDl SMA.docx
imWIiHBIIHIUIMH

Page 5 S.B. NO. 3123
S.D. 1
(d) For the purposes of this section, "donor-conditioned
educational award" means a scholarship, grant, tuition waiver,
or similar educational benefit funded in whole or in part by a
private donation, endowment, or charitable contribution and
subject to donor-imposed conditions."
SECTION 3. This Act shall apply only to donor-conditioned
educational awards and school-conditioned enrollments made on or
after its effective date.
SECTION 4. If any provision of this Act or the application
thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of
the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision
or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are
severable.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.

2026-1082 SB3123 SDl SMA.docx 5
liiiniBiiiiMiiiiiiMiiNni

S.B. NO.
APPROVED this 27th day of March , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B.No. 3123, S.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: March 5, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
President'of tne Senate
Clerk of the Senate
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
MAR 2 2026
Date:
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the House
of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of
2026.
Speaker, House of Representatives
Clerk, House of Representatives
2718